Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 5. Milk and Milk Products

§§ 35-7-501 through 35-7-509.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 173, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1921, ch. 85, §§ 1 through 7 and 9, and Laws 1947, ch. 139, § 5, related to dairies, creameries and dairy products.

§ 35-7-510.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1982, ch. 11, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1921, ch. 85, § 10, related to a dairy inspector.

§ 35-7-511.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 173, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1921, ch. 85, § 11, related to the penalty for violating former §§ 35-7-502 through

35-7-511

.

§ 35-7-512.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1982, ch. 11, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1951, ch. 32, § 1, related to local milk inspection service units.

§§ 35-7-513 through 35-7-526.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 173, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1913, ch. 108, §§ 11 through 15 and 21, and Laws 1947, ch. 139, §§ 1 through 4 and 6 through 9, related to dairies, creameries and dairy products.

Section 35-7-523 was also purportedly amended by Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2, but this amendment was not given effect due to the repeal of that section by Laws 1991, ch. 173, § 2.

§§ 35-7-527 through 35-7-533.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 37, § 4.

Cross references. —

For present provisions regulating food industry, see §

35-7-123

et seq.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1991, ch. 173, § 1, related to the regulation of milk and milk products.